test/src/morphology/N-muorr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - muõrr e-stem puu: # Noun - full paradigm
     muõrr+N+Sg+Nom: muõrr
     muõrr+N+Sg+Gen: muõr
     muõrr+N+Sg+Acc: muõr
     muõrr+N+Sg+Ill: muõ′rre
     muõrr+N+Sg+Loc: muõrâst
     muõrr+N+Sg+Com: muõrin
     muõrr+N+Ess: muõrrân
     muõrr+N+Par: muõrrâd
     muõrr+N+Sg+Abe: muõrtää
     muõrr+N+Pl+Nom: muõr
     muõrr+N+Pl+Gen: muõri
     muõrr+N+Pl+Acc: muõrid
     muõrr+N+Pl+Ill: muõrid
     muõrr+N+Pl+Loc: muõrin
     muõrr+N+Pl+Com: muõrivui′m
     muõrr+N+Pl+Abe: muõritää
